Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 2 LICENSE PLATES
42-3-228. Special plates - Colorado carbon fund.

The department shall issue Colorado carbon fund special license plates to qualified applicants in accordance with this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

The Colorado carbon fund may design the Colorado carbon fund special license plates. The design for the special license plates shall conform with standards established by the department and shall be subject to the department's approval.

A person may apply for the Colorado carbon fund special license plates if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section and provides to the department or an authorized agent a certificate, issued by natural capitalism solutions, a 501 (c)(3) nonprofit organization, or any successor organization, confirming that such person has made to the Colorado carbon fund, or its successor, the donation required to qualify for the special license plates.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees specified for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of each such license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized Colorado carbon fund special license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue such personalized license plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of Colorado carbon fund special license plates for the vehicle upon payment of the fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) and upon turning in the existing license plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized Colorado carbon fund special license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of such personalized license plates. The fees under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other taxes and fees imposed for personalized Colorado carbon fund special license plates.

The department may stop issuing the Colorado carbon fund special license plate if three thousand license plates are not issued by July 1, 2016. A person who was issued a Colorado carbon fund special license plate on or before July 1, 2016, may continue to use the plate after July 1, 2016.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 995, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(6) amended, (SB 09-175), ch. 226, p. 1029, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(6) amended, (HB 11-1236), ch. 98, p. 288, § 7, effective April 8.

L. 2012:

(2) and (3) amended, (HB 12-1315), ch. 224, p. 983, § 54, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(2) and (3) amended, (SB 18-003), ch. 359, p. 2149, § 13, effective June 1.

42-3-229. Special plates - boy scouts.

Beginning July 15, 2009, the department shall issue special license plates to qualified applicants in accordance with this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the boy scouts centennial special license plate, which shall be issued from July 15, 2009, to June 30, 2016, or so long as the department has the special license plates in stock, whichever occurs later.

A person may continue to use the boy scouts centennial special license plate after June 30, 2011, in accordance with this section.

The department is authorized to begin issuance of the special license plate authorized by this subsection (2) if the boy scouts obtain commitments for the purchase of at least three thousand special license plates and provide to the department a list of the names and addresses of persons requesting such plates by January 15, 2009.

Repealed.

The design for the special license plate shall conform with standards established by the department.

A person may apply for a special license plate created by this section if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees specified for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of each such license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized special license plates created by this section. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue such plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of special license plates created by this section for the vehicle upon paying the fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6) and upon turning in such existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized special license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of such personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other taxes and fees imposed for the special license plates created by this section.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 2271, § 2, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2011:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 11-1236), ch. 98, p. 288, § 8, effective April 8; (2)(d) repealed, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1182, § 108, effective August 10.

42-3-230. Special plates - "Alive at Twenty-five".

Beginning January 1, 2010, the department shall issue special license plates to qualified applicants in accordance with this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the "Alive at Twenty-five" special license plate.

The Colorado state patrol family foundation may design the special license plate. The design for the special license plate shall conform with standards established by the department and shall be subject to the department's approval.

A person may apply for an "Alive at Twenty-five" special license plate if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section and provides to the department or an authorized agent a certificate, issued by the Colorado state patrol family foundation or a successor organization, confirming that such person has donated thirty dollars to the Colorado state patrol family foundation.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees specified for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of each such license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized "Alive at Twenty-five" special license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue such plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of "Alive at Twenty-five" special license plates for the vehicle upon payment of the fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6) and upon turning in such existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized "Alive at Twenty-five" special license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of such personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other taxes and fees imposed for personalized "Alive at Twenty-five" special license plates.

The department shall retire the "Alive at Twenty-five" license plate if three thousand plates are not issued by July 1, 2016. A person who was issued an "Alive at Twenty-five" license plate on or before July 1, 2016, may continue to use the plate after July 1, 2016.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1100), ch. 279, p. 1246, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(6) amended, (HB 11-1236), ch. 98, p. 288, § 9, effective April 8.

42-3-231. Special plates - Colorado ski country.

On or after January 1, 2010, the department shall issue Colorado ski country special license plates to qualified applicants in accordance with this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

Colorado ski country USA, inc., may design the special license plates. The plate shall conform with standards established by the department and be subject to approval by the department. The plate shall feature the tagline "Ski Country USA".

A person shall be issued Colorado ski country special license plates if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees specified for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of each such license plate. The department shall transmit the one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized Colorado ski country special license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue such license plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of Colorado ski country special license plates for the vehicle upon payment of the fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6) and upon turning in such existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized Colorado ski country special license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of the personalized license plates. The fees imposed under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other taxes and fees imposed for personalized Colorado ski country special license plates.

The department shall retire the Colorado ski country special license plate if three thousand license plates are not issued by July 1, 2016. A person who was issued a Colorado ski country special license plate on or before July 1, 2016, may continue to use the plate after July 1, 2016.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (HB 11-1236), ch. 98, p. 288, § 10, effective April 8, 2011.)

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-161), ch. 412, p. 2281, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(6) amended, (HB 11-1236), ch. 98, p. 288, § 10, effective April 8.

L. 2012:

(2) amended, (SB 12-007), ch. 88, p. 289, § 4, effective April 6.

42-3-232. Special plates - donate life.

On or after January 1, 2010, the department shall issue donate life special license plates to qualified applicants in accordance with this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

The American transplant foundation, inc., may design the special license plates. The design for the special license plates shall conform with standards established by the department and shall be subject to the department's approval.

A person shall be issued donate life special license plates if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees specified for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of each such license plate. The department shall transmit the one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized donate life special license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue such license plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of donate life special license plates for the vehicle upon payment of the fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6) and upon turning in the existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized donate life special license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of personalized license plates. The fees imposed under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other taxes and fees imposed for personalized donate life special license plates.

The department shall retire the donate life special license plate if three thousand license plates are not issued by July 1, 2016. A person who was issued a donate life special license plate on or before July 1, 2016, may continue to use the plate after July 1, 2016.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (HB 11-1236), ch. 98, p. 289, § 11, effective April 8, 2011.)

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1347), ch. 357, p. 1860, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(6) amended, (HB 11-1236), ch. 98, p. 289, § 11, effective April 8.

42-3-233. Special plates - Colorado state parks.

On or after January 1, 2011, the department shall issue Colorado state parks special license plates to qualified applicants in accordance with this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

The foundation for Colorado state parks may design the special license plates. The design for the special license plates shall conform with standards established by the department and shall be subject to the department's approval.

A person may apply for Colorado state parks special license plates if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section and provides to the department or an authorized agent a certificate, issued by the foundation for Colorado state parks or a successor organization, confirming that the person has donated forty-four dollars to the foundation for Colorado state parks or a successor organization. All moneys collected pursuant to this subsection (3) and all interest and income earned on the investment of such moneys shall be expended on Colorado state parks projects and shall not be used for the administration of the foundation for Colorado state parks or a successor organization. The foundation for Colorado state parks or a successor organization shall hold the moneys collected pursuant to this subsection (3) in a separate account from all other moneys and retain the records of the expenditures of moneys collected pursuant to this subsection (3) for at least three years after the expenditure is made.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees specified for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of each such license plate. The department shall transmit the one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized Colorado state parks special license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue such license plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of Colorado state parks special license plates for the vehicle upon payment of the fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6) and upon turning in such existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized Colorado state parks special license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of the personalized license plates. The fees imposed under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other taxes and fees imposed for personalized Colorado state parks special license plates.

The department may stop issuing the Colorado state parks special license plate if three thousand license plates are not issued by July 1, 2016. A person who was issued a Colorado state parks special license plate on or before July 1, 2016, may continue to use the plate after July 1, 2016.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-103), ch. 304, p. 1437, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2011:

(6) amended, (HB 11-1236), ch. 98, p. 289, § 12, effective April 8.

42-3-234. Special plates - adopt a shelter pet.

Beginning the earlier of January 1, 2011, or when the department is able to issue the plates created by this section, the department shall issue special license plates to qualified applicants in accordance with this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, and noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the adopt a shelter pet special license plate.

The design for the special license plate shall conform with standards established by the department and shall be subject to the department's approval.

A person may apply for an adopt a shelter pet special license plate if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees specified for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect the following fees and donations:

A one-time, twenty-five-dollar fee for issuance or replacement of the license plate, which fee shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.;

A one-time, thirty-dollar donation for issuance or replacement of the license plate, which donation shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the adopt a shelter pet account in the pet overpopulation fund created in section 35-80-116.5, C.R.S.; and

An annual twenty-five-dollar license plate renewal donation, which donation shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the adopt a shelter pet account in the pet overpopulation fund created in section 35-80-116.5, C.R.S.; except that the department and its authorized agents may retain the portion of the donation necessary to offset implementing this paragraph (c), up to a maximum of two dollars.

An applicant may apply for personalized adopt a shelter pet special license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue such plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of adopt a shelter pet special license plates for the vehicle upon payment of the fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6) and upon turning in such existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized adopt a shelter pet special license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of such personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other taxes and fees imposed for personalized adopt a shelter pet special license plates.

The department shall retire the adopt a shelter pet license plate if three thousand plates are not issued by July 1, 2016. A person who was issued an adopt a shelter pet license plate on or before July 1, 2016, may continue to use the plate after July 1, 2016.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (HB 11-1236), ch. 98, p. 289, § 13, effective April 8, 2011.)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1214), ch. 394, p. 1872, § 3, effective August 11.

L. 2011:

(6) amended, (HB 11-1236), ch. 98, p. 289, § 13, effective April 8.

42-3-235. Livery license plates - luxury limousines.

The livery license plate is hereby established. The plate consists of red letters on a white background and features the words "Colorado" across the top and "Livery" across the bottom of the plate.

Except as provided in paragraphs (b) to (d) of this subsection (2), a person providing luxury limousine service under article 10.1 of title 40, C.R.S., shall register the motor vehicle used for such purposes pursuant to this article and display livery license plates on the vehicle. Upon registration, the department shall issue livery license plates for the vehicles in accordance with this section. The department shall not issue a livery license plate unless the person either submits a verification document issued pursuant to section 40-10.1-303, C.R.S., or the public utilities commission electronically verifies the authorization to provide luxury limousine service under section 40-10.1-303, C.R.S.

A person providing luxury limousine service under article 10.1 of title 40, C.R.S., may provide such services without registering the motor vehicle or using livery license plates if the motor vehicle is rented, but the person shall not provide such services using a rented motor vehicle for more than thirty days.

Repealed.

If a motor vehicle is used to provide both taxicab services and luxury limousine services, the department shall issue the motor vehicle a taxicab license plate in accordance with section 42-3-236.

Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue personalized livery license plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of special livery license plates upon paying the fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) and upon turning the existing plates in to the department. A person who has obtained personalized livery license plates under this subsection (3) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of such personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (3) are in addition to all other taxes and fees imposed for the livery license plates.

No person shall operate a motor vehicle with a livery license plate or temporary livery license plate unless the motor vehicle to which the plates are attached is required by subsection (2) of this section to bear livery license plates. A person who violates this section commits a class B traffic infraction, punishable by a fine of seventy-five dollars.

If the person who owns the motor vehicle with livery plates is not the same person under whose authority the motor vehicle operates pursuant to article 10.1 of title 40, C.R.S., the person with such authority may request that the department of revenue require the plate to be replaced. Upon a request being made, the department shall require the owner to return the livery license plate and be issued a new license plate.

This section is effective January 1, 2011.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1161), ch. 319, p. 1484, § 2, effective August 11.

L. 2011:

(2)(a) amended and (2)(d) added, (HB 11-1234), ch. 142, p. 496, § 3, effective July 1; (2)(a), (2)(b), and (5) amended, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 424, § 23, effective August 10.

42-3-235.5. Tow truck license plates - conditions for use - transitional provisions.

The tow truck license plate is hereby established. The plate consists of black letters on a yellow background and features the words "Colorado" across the top and "Tow Truck" across the bottom of the plate.

A person who is authorized to operate as a towing carrier under article 10.1 of title 40, C.R.S., shall register a motor vehicle used for towing purposes under this article and display either tow truck license plates or apportioned plates on the vehicle. Upon registration, the department shall issue tow truck license plates for the vehicle in accordance with this section. The department shall not issue tow truck license plates unless the person either submits a verification document or the public utilities commission electronically verifies the authorization as provided in section 40-10.1-402, C.R.S.

Repealed.

A person shall not operate a motor vehicle with tow truck license plates or temporary tow truck license plates unless the motor vehicle to which the plates are attached is required by subsection (2) of this section to bear tow truck license plates.

If the person who owns the motor vehicle with tow truck license plates is not the person under whose authority the motor vehicle operates under article 10.1 of title 40, C.R.S., the person with the authority may request that the department require the plates to be replaced. Within thirty days after receiving the request, the department shall require the owner of the motor vehicle to return the tow truck license plates and be issued new license plates. The owner of the motor vehicle shall surrender the tow truck license plates to the department within ten days after receiving notice from the department unless the owner of the motor vehicle obtains authority to operate a tow truck under part 4 of article 10.1 of title 40, C.R.S., either directly or as an agent, and either the person submits a verification document or the public utilities commission electronically verifies the authorization as provided in section 40-10.1-402, C.R.S.

A person who violates this section commits a class B traffic infraction, punishable by a fine of seventy-five dollars.

This section is effective January 1, 2013.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1327), ch. 217, p. 933, § 4, effective May 24.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (3), effective January 1, 2014. (See

L. 2012, p. 933

.)

42-3-236. Taxicab license plates - taxicabs.

The taxicab license plate is hereby established. The plate consists of black letters on a yellow background and features the words "Colorado" across the top and "taxicab" across the bottom of the plate.

A person that is authorized to provide taxicab service or large-market taxicab service under article 10.1 of title 40 shall register a motor vehicle used for taxicab purposes under this article 3 and display taxicab license plates on the vehicle. Upon registration, the department shall issue taxicab license plates for the vehicle in accordance with this section. The department shall not issue a taxicab license plate unless the person either submits a verification document or the public utilities commission electronically verifies the authorization as provided in section 40-10.1-207.

Repealed.

A person shall not operate a motor vehicle with a taxicab license plate or temporary taxicab license plate unless the motor vehicle to which the plates are attached is required by subsection (2) of this section to bear taxicab license plates.

If the person who owns the motor vehicle with taxicab license plates is not the person under whose authority the motor vehicle operates under article 10.1 of title 40, the person with the authority may request that the department require the plate to be replaced. Within thirty days after receiving the request, the department shall require the owner of the motor vehicle to return the taxicab license plate and be issued a new license plate. The owner of the motor vehicle shall surrender the taxicab license plate to the department within ten days after receiving notice from the department unless the owner of the motor vehicle obtains authority to operate a taxicab under part 2 or 7 of article 10.1 of title 40, either directly or as an agent, and either the person submits a verification document or the public utilities commission electronically verifies the authorization as provided in section 40-10.1-207.

A person who violates this section commits a class B traffic infraction, punishable by a fine of seventy-five dollars.

This section is effective January 1, 2012.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (HB 11-1234), ch. 142, p. 496, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(2) and (5) amended, (HB 18-1320), ch. 363, p. 2170, § 11, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of subsection (3), effective January 1, 2013. (See

L. 2011, p. 496

.)

42-3-237. Special plates - girl scouts.

Beginning January 1, 2012, the department shall issue special license plates to qualified applicants in accordance with this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the girl scouts centennial special license plate.

The girl scouts of Colorado may design the girl scouts centennial special license plate, but the plate must conform with standards established by the department.

A person may apply for a special license plate under this section if the person pays the taxes and fees required by this section.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees specified for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for the issuance or replacement of each such license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized special license plates created by this section. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue such plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of special license plates created by this section for the vehicle upon paying the fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) and upon turning in such existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized special license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of such personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other taxes and fees imposed for the special license plates created by this section.

The department may stop issuing the girl scouts centennial special license plate if three thousand license plates are not issued by July 1, 2017. A person who was issued the plate on or before July 1, 2017, may continue to use the plate after July 1, 2017.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (SB 11-197), ch. 291, p. 1355, § 1, effective August 10.

42-3-238. Special plates - juvenile diabetes.

Beginning the earlier of January 1, 2012, or when the department is able to issue the plates, the department shall issue special license plates to qualified applicants under this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the juvenile diabetes special license plate. The department may stop issuing the juvenile diabetes special license plate if three thousand license plates are not issued by July 1, 2014. A person may continue to use the juvenile diabetes special license plate after July 1, 2014.

The juvenile diabetes research foundation may design the special license plate. The design for the special license plate must conform with standards established by the department and is subject to the department's approval.

A person may apply for a juvenile diabetes special license plate if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of each such license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fee to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized juvenile diabetes special license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue such plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of juvenile diabetes special license plates for the vehicle upon paying the fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) and upon turning in the existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized juvenile diabetes special license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of such personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other applicable taxes and fees.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (HB 11-1166), ch. 276, p. 1241, § 1, effective August 10.

42-3-239. Special plates - Colorado Avalanche or Denver Nuggets.

Beginning the earlier of January 1, 2012, or when the department is able to issue the plates, the department shall issue special license plates to qualified applicants under this section for motorcycles, passenger cars, trucks, or noncommercial or recreational motor vehicles that do not exceed sixteen thousand pounds empty weight.

There is hereby established the Colorado Avalanche and Denver Nuggets special license plates. The department may stop issuing either the Colorado Avalanche or Denver Nuggets special license plate if a total of three thousand license plates, of either design, are not issued by July 1, 2016. A person may continue to use either the Colorado Avalanche or Denver Nuggets special license plate after July 1, 2016.

Kroenke sports charities may design the special license plates, but the design must conform with standards established by the department.

A person may apply for a Colorado Avalanche or Denver Nuggets special license plate if the person pays the taxes and fees required under this section and provides to the department or an authorized agent a certificate, issued by Kroenke sports charities or its successor organization, confirming that the applicant has donated forty-five dollars to Kroenke sports charities.

Kroenke sports charities, or its successor organization, shall file with the department an annual statement verifying that it is a nonprofit organization.

The amount of the taxes and fees for special license plates under this section is the same as the amount of the taxes and fees for regular motor vehicle license plates; except that the department shall collect a one-time fee of twenty-five dollars for issuance or replacement of each such license plate. The department shall transmit the additional one-time fee to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fee to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201, C.R.S.

An applicant may apply for personalized Colorado Avalanche or Denver Nuggets special license plates. Upon payment of the additional fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) for personalized license plates, the department may issue the plates if the applicant complies with section 42-3-211. If an applicant has existing personalized license plates for a motor vehicle, the applicant may transfer the combination of letters or numbers to a new set of Colorado Avalanche or Denver Nuggets special license plates for the vehicle upon paying the fee required by section 42-3-211 (6)(a) and upon turning in the existing plates to the department. A person who has obtained personalized Colorado Avalanche or Denver Nuggets special license plates under this subsection (5) shall pay the annual fee imposed by section 42-3-211 (6)(b) for renewal of the personalized plates. The fees under this subsection (5) are in addition to all other applicable taxes and fees.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (HB 11-1316), ch. 192, p. 738, § 1, effective August 10.